Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-302] Enforcement under Hague
Convention. Under this part a court of this State may enforce an order for
the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of
International Child Abduction as if it were a child-custody determination. [L
2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next